uz.aff
SFX Y 0 ishganingnimi . 
SFX Y 0 ishganingnidir . 
SFX Y 0 ishganingnida . 
SFX Y 0 ishganingnidirda . 
SFX Y 0 ishganingnimikan . 
SFX Y 0 ishganingniku . 
SFX Y 0 ishganingga . 
SFX Y 0 ishganinggami . 
SFX Y 0 ishganinggadir . 
SFX Y 0 ishganinggada . 
SFX Y 0 ishganinggadirda . 
SFX Y 0 ishganinggamikan . 
SFX Y 0 ishganinggaku . 
SFX Y 0 ishganingdan . 
SFX Y 0 ishganingdanmi . 
SFX Y 0 ishganingdandir . 
SFX Y 0 ishganingdanda . 
SFX Y 0 ishganingdandirda . 
SFX Y 0 ishganingdanmikan . 
SFX Y 0 ishganingdanku . 
SFX Y 0 ishganingda . 
SFX Y 0 ishganingdami . 
SFX Y 0 ishganingdadir . 
SFX Y 0 ishganingdada . 
SFX Y 0 ishganingdadirda . 
SFX Y 0 ishganingdamikan . 
SFX Y 0 ishganingdaku . 
SFX Y 0 ishganlaringni . 
SFX Y 0 ishganlaringnimi . 
SFX Y 0 ishganlaringnidir . 
SFX Y 0 ishganlaringnida . 
SFX Y 0 ishganlaringnidirda . 
SFX Y 0 ishganlaringnimikan . 
SFX Y 0 ishganlaringniku . 
SFX Y 0 ishganlaringga . 
SFX Y 0 ishganlaringgami . 
SFX Y 0 ishganlaringgadir . 
SFX Y 0 ishganlaringgada . 
SFX Y 0 ishganlaringgadirda . 
SFX Y 0 ishganlaringgamikan . 
SFX Y 0 ishganlaringgaku . 
SFX Y 0 ishganlaringdan . 
SFX Y 0 ishganlaringdanmi . 
SFX Y 0 ishganlaringdandir . 
SFX Y 0 ishganlaringdanda . 
SFX Y 0 ishganlaringdandirda . 
SFX Y 0 ishganlaringdanmikan . 
SFX Y 0 ishganlaringdanku . 
SFX Y 0 ishganlaringda . 
SFX Y 0 ishganlaringdami . 
SFX Y 0 ishganlaringdadir . 
SFX Y 0 ishganlaringdada . 
SFX Y 0 ishganlaringdadirda . 
SFX Y 0 ishganlaringdamikan . 
SFX Y 0 ishganlaringdaku . 
SFX Y 0 ishmaganingni . 
SFX Y 0 ishmaganingnimi . 
SFX Y 0 ishmaganingnidir . 
SFX Y 0 ishmaganingnida . 
SFX Y 0 ishmaganingnidirda . 
SFX Y 0 ishmaganingnimikan . 
SFX Y 0 ishmaganingniku . 
SFX Y 0 ishmaganingga . 
SFX Y 0 ishmaganinggami . 
SFX Y 0 ishmaganinggadir . 
SFX Y 0 ishmaganinggada . 
SFX Y 0 ishmaganinggadirda . 
SFX Y 0 ishmaganinggamikan . 
SFX Y 0 ishmaganinggaku . 
SFX Y 0 ishmaganingdan . 
SFX Y 0 ishmaganingdanmi . 
SFX Y 0 ishmaganingdandir . 
SFX Y 0 ishmaganingdanda . 
SFX Y 0 ishmaganingdandirda . 
SFX Y 0 ishmaganingdanmikan . 
SFX Y 0 ishmaganingdanku . 
SFX Y 0 ishmaganingda . 
SFX Y 0 ishmaganingdami . 
SFX Y 0 ishmaganingdadir . 
SFX Y 0 ishmaganingdada . 
SFX Y 0 ishmaganingdadirda . 
SFX Y 0 ishmaganingdamikan . 
SFX Y 0 ishmaganingdaku . 
SFX Y 0 ishmaganlaringni . 
SFX Y 0 ishmaganlaringnimi . 
SFX Y 0 ishmaganlaringnidir . 
SFX Y 0 ishmaganlaringnida . 
SFX Y 0 ishmaganlaringnidirda . 
SFX Y 0 ishmaganlaringnimikan . 
SFX Y 0 ishmaganlaringniku . 
SFX Y 0 ishmaganlaringga . 
SFX Y 0 ishmaganlaringgami . 
SFX Y 0 ishmaganlaringgadir . 
SFX Y 0 ishmaganlaringgada . 
SFX Y 0 ishmaganlaringgadirda . 
SFX Y 0 ishmaganlaringgamikan . 
SFX Y 0 ishmaganlaringgaku . 
SFX Y 0 ishmaganlaringdan . 
SFX Y 0 ishmaganlaringdanmi . 
SFX Y 0 ishmaganlaringdandir . 
SFX Y 0 ishmaganlaringdanda . 
SFX Y 0 ishmaganlaringdandirda . 
SFX Y 0 ishmaganlaringdanmikan . 
SFX Y 0 ishmaganlaringdanku . 
SFX Y 0 ishmaganlaringda . 
SFX Y 0 ishmaganlaringdami . 
SFX Y 0 ishmaganlaringdadir . 
SFX Y 0 ishmaganlaringdada . 
SFX Y 0 ishmaganlaringdadirda . 
SFX Y 0 ishmaganlaringdamikan . 
SFX Y 0 ishmaganlaringdaku . 
SFX Y 0 dirganingni . 
SFX Y 0 dirganingnimi . 
SFX Y 0 dirganingnidir . 
SFX Y 0 dirganingnida . 
SFX Y 0 dirganingnidirda . 
SFX Y 0 dirganingnimikan . 
SFX Y 0 dirganingniku . 
SFX Y 0 dirganingga . 
SFX Y 0 dirganinggami . 
SFX Y 0 dirganinggadir . 
SFX Y 0 dirganinggada . 
SFX Y 0 dirganinggadirda . 
SFX Y 0 dirganinggamikan . 
SFX Y 0 dirganinggaku . 
SFX Y 0 dirganingdan . 
SFX Y 0 dirganingdanmi . 
SFX Y 0 dirganingdandir . 
SFX Y 0 dirganingdanda . 
SFX Y 0 dirganingdandirda . 
SFX Y 0 dirganingdanmikan . 
SFX Y 0 dirganingdanku . 
SFX Y 0 dirganingda . 
SFX Y 0 dirganingdami . 
SFX Y 0 dirganingdadir . 
SFX Y 0 dirganingdada . 
SFX Y 0 dirganingdadirda . 
SFX Y 0 dirganingdamikan . 
SFX Y 0 dirganingdaku . 
SFX Y 0 dirganlaringni . 
SFX Y 0 dirganlaringnimi . 
SFX Y 0 dirganlaringnidir . 
SFX Y 0 dirganlaringnida . 
SFX Y 0 dirganlaringnidirda . 
SFX Y 0 dirganlaringnimikan . 
SFX Y 0 dirganlaringniku . 
SFX Y 0 dirganlaringga . 
SFX Y 0 dirganlaringgami . 
SFX Y 0 dirganlaringgadir . 
SFX Y 0 dirganlaringgada . 
SFX Y 0 dirganlaringgadirda . 
SFX Y 0 dirganlaringgamikan . 
SFX Y 0 dirganlaringgaku . 
SFX Y 0 dirganlaringdan . 
SFX Y 0 dirganlaringdanmi . 
SFX Y 0 dirganlaringdandir . 
SFX Y 0 dirganlaringdanda . 
SFX Y 0 dirganlaringdandirda . 
SFX Y 0 dirganlaringdanmikan . 
SFX Y 0 dirganlaringdanku . 
SFX Y 0 dirganlaringda . 
SFX Y 0 dirganlaringdami . 
SFX Y 0 dirganlaringdadir . 
SFX Y 0 dirganlaringdada . 
SFX Y 0 dirganlaringdadirda . 
SFX Y 0 dirganlaringdamikan . 
SFX Y 0 dirganlaringdaku . 
SFX Y 0 dirmaganingni . 
SFX Y 0 dirmaganingnimi . 
SFX Y 0 dirmaganingnidir . 
SFX Y 0 dirmaganingnida . 
SFX Y 0 dirmaganingnidirda . 
SFX Y 0 dirmaganingnimikan . 
SFX Y 0 dirmaganingniku . 
SFX Y 0 dirmaganingga . 
SFX Y 0 dirmaganinggami . 
SFX Y 0 dirmaganinggadir . 
SFX Y 0 dirmaganinggada . 
SFX Y 0 dirmaganinggadirda . 
SFX Y 0 dirmaganinggamikan . 
SFX Y 0 dirmaganinggaku . 
SFX Y 0 dirmaganingdan . 
SFX Y 0 dirmaganingdanmi . 
SFX Y 0 dirmaganingdandir . 
SFX Y 0 dirmaganingdanda . 
SFX Y 0 dirmaganingdandirda . 
SFX Y 0 dirmaganingdanmikan . 
SFX Y 0 dirmaganingdanku . 
SFX Y 0 dirmaganingda . 
SFX Y 0 dirmaganingdami . 
SFX Y 0 dirmaganingdadir . 
SFX Y 0 dirmaganingdada . 
SFX Y 0 dirmaganingdadirda . 
SFX Y 0 dirmaganingdamikan . 
SFX Y 0 dirmaganingdaku . 
SFX Y 0 dirmaganlaringni . 
SFX Y 0 dirmaganlaringnimi . 
SFX Y 0 dirmaganlaringnidir . 
SFX Y 0 dirmaganlaringnida . 
SFX Y 0 dirmaganlaringnidirda . 
SFX Y 0 dirmaganlaringnimikan . 
SFX Y 0 dirmaganlaringniku . 
SFX Y 0 dirmaganlaringga . 
SFX Y 0 dirmaganlaringgami . 
SFX Y 0 dirmaganlaringgadir . 
SFX Y 0 dirmaganlaringgada . 
SFX Y 0 dirmaganlaringgadirda . 
SFX Y 0 dirmaganlaringgamikan . 
SFX Y 0 dirmaganlaringgaku . 
SFX Y 0 dirmaganlaringdan . 
SFX Y 0 dirmaganlaringdanmi . 
SFX Y 0 dirmaganlaringdandir . 
SFX Y 0 dirmaganlaringdanda . 
SFX Y 0 dirmaganlaringdandirda . 
SFX Y 0 dirmaganlaringdanmikan . 
SFX Y 0 dirmaganlaringdanku . 
SFX Y 0 dirmaganlaringda . 
SFX Y 0 dirmaganlaringdami . 
SFX Y 0 dirmaganlaringdadir . 
SFX Y 0 dirmaganlaringdada . 
SFX Y 0 dirmaganlaringdadirda . 
SFX Y 0 dirmaganlaringdamikan . 
SFX Y 0 dirmaganlaringdaku . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirganingni . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirganingnimi . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirganingnidir . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirganingnida . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirganingnidirda . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirganingnimikan . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirganingniku . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirganingga . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirganinggami . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirganinggadir . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirganinggada . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirganinggadirda . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirganinggamikan . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirganinggaku . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirganingdan . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirganingdanmi . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirganingdandir . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirganingdanda . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirganingdandirda . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirganingdanmikan . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirganingdanku . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirganingda . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirganingdami . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirganingdadir . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirganingdada . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirganingdadirda . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirganingdamikan . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirganingdaku . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirganlaringni . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirganlaringnimi . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirganlaringnidir . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirganlaringnida . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirganlaringnidirda . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirganlaringnimikan . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirganlaringniku . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirganlaringga . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirganlaringgami . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirganlaringgadir . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirganlaringgada . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirganlaringgadirda . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirganlaringgamikan . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirganlaringgaku . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirganlaringdan . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirganlaringdanmi . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirganlaringdandir . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirganlaringdanda . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirganlaringdandirda . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirganlaringdanmikan . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirganlaringdanku . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirganlaringda . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirganlaringdami . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirganlaringdadir . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirganlaringdada . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirganlaringdadirda . 
