uz.dic
abzallan/Y
avtomatlashtir/Y
adashtir/Y
ajratil/Y
ayblantir/Y
aylan/Y
ayriltir/Y
alag’dalan/Y
aldash/Y
allalash/Y
angillash/Y
andavalat/Y
apshur/Y
arzonlashtir/Y
artil/Y
archittir/Y
asrat/Y
atal/Y
axtar/Y
achomlash/Y
bag’ishlattir/Y
bayovlash/Y
bayirlash/Y
balanslashtir/Y
barqarorlash/Y
bastalash/Y
bahuzurlan/Y
bedardlash/Y
bezat/Y
bezit/Y
bekit/Y
belgilash/Y
berilish/Y
berklan/Y
beso’naqaylash/Y
betlash/Y
behuzurlan/Y
bijg’it/Y
biqtir/Y
bildirtir/Y
billurlan/Y
biriktir/Y
bitishtir/Y
bich/Y
bozillat/Y
boqtiril/Y
bolsheviklashtir/Y
bosil/Y
botirish/Y
boshqaril/Y
boshlash/Y
bo’g’iltir/Y
bo’g’ovlan/Y
bo’zar/Y
bo’z/Y
bo’ysun/Y
buklat/Y
bukchaytir/Y
bulg’at/Y
bo’lish/Y
bo’ralan/Y
burjuylash/Y
bo’rlan/Y
bo’rrolash/Y
burchit/Y
butoqlantir/Y
bo’shantir/Y
buyuklash/Y
bo’yan/Y
vadillat/Y
vazminlashtir/Y
valaqlash/Y
varanglat/Y
vashillat/Y
vishillash/Y
gavdalantiril/Y
galalashtir/Y
gapiraver/Y
gaplash/Y
gerday/Y
gizillat/Y
gruppalash/Y
go’zallan/Y
gumonlan/Y
gupurtir/Y
gushnalash/Y
dag’allashtir/Y
dakanglat/Y
dambalat/Y
darbadarlash/Y
darralattir/Y
dedir/Y
deparalashtir/Y
dikillat/Y
dildirat/Y
dirillat/Y
dovdirash/Y
dokumentlashtir/Y
dugonalash/Y
do’qanglat/Y
do’mpay/Y
do’ppaslash/Y
durushtlan/Y
yevropalashtiril/Y
yegizdirish/Y
yog’lattir/Y
yodlan/Y
yozdirtir/Y
yoydir/Y
yoy/Y
yoqtirish/Y
yeldirtir/Y
yollan/Y
yemirtir/Y
yondash/Y
yordirgiz/Y
yetaklash/Y
yotlash/Y
yoshartir/Y
jadallan/Y
jvalash/Y
jildirat/Y
jirkantir/Y
jo’iavor/Y
zavqlan/Y
zararsizlantiril/Y
ziykatlantir/Y
zoklat/Y
iayniqlan/Y
izlat/Y
iydiril/Y
yiringlat/Y
iqrorlan/Y
iljayt/Y
imillash/Y
injil/Y
iomardlash/Y
isbotlan/Y
issiqlantir/Y
yo’ydir/Y
yo’ndirtir/Y
ixtisoslashtiril/Y
ichnktir/Y
ishlash/Y
kayfsizlantir/Y
kamittir/Y
kattakonlash/Y
keksay/Y
kengaytiril/Y
keskinlashtir/Y
kechirtir/Y
kiyinish/Y
kirish/Y
kishnash/Y
konstitutsiyalashtir/Y
ko’zlash/Y
ko’llat/Y
kunlash/Y
kuratil/Y
ko’r/Y
kuttir/Y
qabar/Y
qavit/Y
qazish/Y
qayril/Y
qaqolat/Y
qalqish/Y
qanqaytir/Y
qarg’at/Y
qatil/Y
qahsahlash/Y
qizg’anish/Y
qiydirt/Y
qiyrat/Y
qil/Y
qing’irlan/Y
qirtishlan/Y
qitiqlan/Y
qobillash/Y
qo’zg’al/Y
qo’ltiqlash/Y
qo’rg’al/Y
qurollantir/Y
qutultir/Y
qo’yaver/Y
larzanglat/Y
loyqalat/Y
mavjlan/Y
maydalashtiril/Y
manqalan/Y
ma’qullan/Y
mijg’ilat/Y
mingiz/Y
mojarolash/Y
muayyanlashtir/Y
muzlat/Y
mo’ltay/Y
mo’xtasarlash/Y
naqshlat/Y
nahslash/Y
nishoblash/Y
nosozlash/Y
obodonlashtyaril/Y
ovut/Y
odatlantir/Y
oz/Y
oqsoqlan/Y
olqash/Y
ommalashtiril/Y
orqalat/Y
ostir/Y
ochir/Y
oshirib-toshir/Y
parlat/Y
pechatlan/Y
pishiqtir/Y
poylash/Y
pullan/Y
ravshanlash/Y
ranjitil/Y
rizvlantir/Y
sayozlan/Y
saqlash/Y
sapchit/Y
sevib-sevil/Y
selpit/Y
seskantir/Y
siylayver/Y
silliqlash/Y
sipqarish/Y
sittir/Y
sog’lomlan/Y
solqilan/Y
standartlashtir/Y
sudral/Y
suykaltir/Y
sulaytir/Y
supur/Y
surish/Y
surttir/Y
so’yal/Y
tayoqlan/Y
takmillash/Y
taqil/Y
tamaddilan/Y
tanqay/Y
taral/Y
tasqaralash/Y
tashvishlan/Y
ta’sirlan/Y
tegish/Y
tekislattir/Y
tepinish/Y
termilish/Y
tizilish/Y
tiklashtir/Y
tilantir/Y
timtalash/Y
tinchlan/Y
tiriqlat/Y
tirtay/Y
tixirlan/Y
tozalat/Y
toliblan/Y
topaver/Y
topshirtir/Y
toshirtir/Y
to’g’rash/Y
to’zdiril/Y
to’yg’iz/Y
to’qimlat/Y
tulattir/Y
tulkilan/Y
to’ng/Y
to’plash/Y
turtish/Y
tutashtiril/Y
to’xtat/Y
tushuntiril/Y
o’girish/Y
uzatil/Y
o’zlash/Y
uydiril/Y
o’ymalat/Y
o’ksin/Y
o’qtalish/Y
o’l/Y
umbalag’osh/Y
un/Y
o’rantir/Y
urinib-surin/Y
o’rnatil/Y
o’sallan/Y
o’tirtir/Y
o’tqiz/Y
uxchit/Y
uchqunlat/Y
o’shqirtir/Y
faqirlan/Y
xarjlan/Y
xivichlan/Y
xirpalan/Y
xoslan/Y
xurjunlashtir/Y
safiyelash/Y
chayqal/Y
chaqirish/Y
chalg’ittir/Y
chalchiqlan/Y
chaplash/Y
chatoqlash/Y
chek/Y
chig’an/Y
chiyillash/Y
chiqillat/Y
chinqirish/Y
chirmash/Y
chopil/Y
chuvat/Y
cho’zaver/Y
cho’kkalattir/Y
chulg’at/Y
churqchurqlash/Y
cho’chchaytiril/Y
shaqillash/Y
shapoqlan/Y
shig’raytir/Y
shimarin/Y
shipir/Y
shndilyaat/Y
shoxlan/Y
shug’ullan/Y
ebortiril/Y
egasizlantirish/Y
eyovlap/Y
eyrat/Y
ekunlan/Y
elantir/Y
elin/Y
elpoqlash/Y
emdalash/Y
endir/Y
erin/Y
eslattir/Y
esh/Y
yupqalashtir/Y
yaqinlan/Y
yaratil/Y
yasatil/Y
yashiklat/Y
